Missouri, session 2026, SB1218.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 213.010, 213.030, 213.040, 213.045,
213.050, 213.055, 213.065, 213.070, and 213.101, RSMo, are
repealed and nine new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 213.010, 213.030, 213.040, 213.045, 213.050,
213.055, 213.065, 213.070, and 213.101, to read as follows:
213.010. As used in this chapter, the following terms
shall mean:
(1) "A motivating factor", the employee's protected
classification that actually played a role in the adverse
action or decision and had a determinative influence on the
adverse decision or action;
(2) "Age", an age of forty or more years but less than
seventy years, except that it shall not be an unlawful
employment practice for an employer to require the
compulsory retirement of any person who has attained the age
of sixty-five and who, for the two-year period immediately
before retirement, is employed in a bona fide executive or
high policy-making position, if such person is entitled to
an immediate nonforfeitable annual retirement benefit from a
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1218 2
pension, profit sharing, savings or deferred compensation
plan, or any combination of such plans, of the employer,
which equals, in the aggregate, at least forty-four thousand
dollars;
[(2)] (3) "Because" or "because of", as it relates to
the adverse decision or action, the protected criterion was
the motivating factor;
[(3)] (4) "Commission", the Missouri commission on
human rights;
[(4)] (5) "Complainant", a person who has filed a
complaint with the commission alleging that another person
has engaged in a prohibited discriminatory practice;
[(5)] (6) "Disability", a physical or mental
impairment which substantially limits one or more of a
person's major life activities, being regarded as having
such an impairment, or a record of having such an
impairment, which with or without reasonable accommodation
does not interfere with performing the job, utilizing the
place of public accommodation, or occupying the dwelling in
question. For purposes of this chapter, the term
"disability" does not include current, illegal use of or
addiction to a controlled substance as such term is defined
by section 195.010; however, a person may be considered to
have a disability if that person:
(a) Has successfully completed a supervised drug
rehabilitation program and is no longer engaging in the
illegal use of, and is not currently addicted to, a
controlled substance or has otherwise been rehabilitated
successfully and is no longer engaging in such use and is
not currently addicted;

SB 1218 3
(b) Is participating in a supervised rehabilitation
program and is no longer engaging in illegal use of
controlled substances; or
(c) Is erroneously regarded as currently illegally
using, or being addicted to, a controlled substance;
[(6)] (7) "Discrimination", conduct proscribed herein,
taken because of race, color, religion, national origin,
ancestry, sex, [or] sexual orientation, gender identity, or
age, as it relates to employment, disability, veteran
status, or familial status as it relates to housing.
Discrimination includes any unfair treatment based on a
person's presumed or assumed race, color, religion, national
origin, ancestry, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,
or age, as it relates to employment, disability, veteran
status, or familial status as it relates to housing,
regardless of whether the presumption or assumption as to
such characteristic is correct;
[(7)] (8) "Dwelling", any building, structure or
portion thereof which is occupied as, or designed or
intended for occupancy as, a residence by one or more
families, and any vacant land which is offered for sale or
lease for the construction or location thereon of any such
building, structure or portion thereof;
[(8)] (9) "Employer", a person engaged in an industry
affecting commerce who has six or more employees for each
working day in each of twenty or more calendar weeks in the
current or preceding calendar year, and shall include the
state, or any political or civil subdivision thereof, or any
person employing six or more persons within the state but
does not include corporations and associations owned [or]
and operated by religious or sectarian organizations.
"Employer" shall not include:

SB 1218 4
(a) The United States;
(b) A corporation wholly owned by the government of
the United States;
(c) [An individual employed by an employer;
(d)] An Indian tribe;
[(e)] (d) Any department or agency of the District of
Columbia subject by statute to procedures of the competitive
service, as defined in 5 U.S.C. Section [2101] 2102; or
[(f)] (e) A bona fide private membership club, other
than a labor organization, that is exempt from taxation
under 26 U.S.C. Section 501(c);
[(9)] (10) "Employment agency" includes any person or
agency, public or private, regularly undertaking with or
without compensation to procure employees for an employer or
to procure for employees opportunities to work for an
employer;
[(10)] (11) "Executive director", the executive
director of the Missouri commission on human rights;
[(11)] (12) "Familial status", one or more individuals
who have not attained the age of eighteen years being
domiciled with:
(a) A parent or another person having legal custody of
such individual; or
100 (b) The designee of such parent or other person having
101 such custody, with the written permission of such parent or
102 other person. The protections afforded against
103 discrimination because of familial status shall apply to any
104 person who is pregnant or is in the process of securing
105 legal custody of any individual who has not attained the age
106 of eighteen years;
107 (13) "Gender identity", the gender-related identity,
108 appearance, mannerisms, or other gender-related

SB 1218 5
109 characteristics of an individual, with or without regard to
110 the individual's assigned sex at birth;
111 [(12)] (14) "Human rights fund", a fund established to
112 receive civil penalties as required by federal regulations
113 and as set forth by subdivision (2) of subsection 11 of
114 section 213.075, and which will be disbursed to offset
115 additional expenses related to compliance with the
116 Department of Housing and Urban Development regulations;
117 [(13)] (15) "Labor organization" includes any
118 organization which exists for the purpose, in whole or in
119 part, of collective bargaining or of dealing with employers
120 concerning grievances, terms or conditions of employment, or
121 for other mutual aid or protection in relation to employment;
122 [(14)] (16) "Local commissions", any commission or
123 agency established prior to August 13, 1986, by an ordinance
124 or order adopted by the governing body of any city,
125 constitutional charter city, town, village, or county;
126 [(15)] (17) "Person" includes one or more individuals,
127 corporations, partnerships, associations, organizations,
128 labor organizations, legal representatives, mutual
129 companies, joint stock companies, trusts, trustees, trustees
130 in bankruptcy, receivers, fiduciaries, or other organized
131 groups of persons;
132 [(16)] (18) "Places of public accommodation", all
133 places or businesses offering or holding out to the general
134 public, goods, services, privileges, facilities, advantages
135 or accommodations for the peace, comfort, health, welfare
136 and safety of the general public or such public places
137 providing food, shelter, recreation and amusement,
138 including, but not limited to:
139 (a) Any inn, hotel, motel, or other establishment
140 which provides lodging to transient guests, other than an

SB 1218 6
141 establishment located within a building which contains not
142 more than five rooms for rent or hire and which is actually
143 occupied by the proprietor of such establishment as [his]
144 the proprietor's residence;
145 (b) Any restaurant, cafeteria, lunchroom, lunch
146 counter, soda fountain, or other facility principally
147 engaged in selling food for consumption on the premises,
148 including, but not limited to, any such facility located on
149 the premises of any retail establishment;
150 (c) Any gasoline station, including all facilities
151 located on the premises of such gasoline station and made
152 available to the patrons thereof;
153 (d) Any motion picture house, theater, concert hall,
154 sports arena, stadium, or other place of exhibition or
155 entertainment;
156 (e) Any public facility owned, operated, or managed by
157 or on behalf of this state or any agency or subdivision
158 thereof, or any public corporation; and any such facility
159 supported in whole or in part by public funds;
160 (f) Any establishment which is physically located
161 within the premises of any establishment otherwise covered
162 by this section or within the premises of which is
163 physically located any such covered establishment, and which
164 holds itself out as serving patrons of such covered
165 establishment;
166 (19) "Race", includes a perception that a person is of
167 a particular racial group based upon:
168 (a) Shared physical traits associated with ancestral
169 origin or ethnicity;
170 (b) Shared cultural attributes;
171 (c) Wearing of protective hairstyles including, but
172 not limited to, hairstyles and coverings that are designed

SB 1218 7
173 to protect textured hair from damage so it may be worn in
174 its natural state such as braids, wigs, locks, twists, and
175 afros; and
176 (d) Similar physical characteristics such as skin
177 color and facial features;
178 [(17)] (20) "Rent" includes to lease, to sublease, to
179 let and otherwise to grant for consideration the right to
180 occupy premises not owned by the occupant;
181 [(18)] (21) "Respondent", a person who is alleged to
182 have engaged in a prohibited discriminatory practice in a
183 complaint filed with the commission;
184 [(19) "The motivating factor", the employee's
185 protected classification actually played a role in the
186 adverse action or decision and had a determinative influence
187 on the adverse decision or action;]
188 (22) "Sexual orientation", one's actual or perceived
189 emotional or physical attraction to, or romantic or physical
190 relationships with, members of the same gender, members of a
191 different gender, or members of any gender; or the lack of
192 any emotional or physical attraction to, or romantic or
193 physical relationships with, anyone. The term "sexual
194 orientation" includes a history of such attraction or
195 relationship or a history of no such attraction or
196 relationship;
197 [(20)] (23) "Unlawful discriminatory practice", any
198 act that is unlawful under this chapter;
199 (24) "Veteran status", an individual who served in a
200 branch of the military of the United States or in the
201 Missouri National Guard and was discharged for any reason
202 other than dishonorable discharge or bad conduct discharge.
213.030. 1. The powers and duties of the commission
shall be:

SB 1218 8
(1) To seek to eliminate and prevent discrimination
because of race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry,
sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, as it relates
to employment, disability, veteran status, or familial
status as it relates to housing and to take other actions
against discrimination because of race, color, religion,
national origin, ancestry, sex, sexual orientation, gender
identity, age, disability, veteran status, or familial
status as provided by law; and the commission is hereby
given general jurisdiction and power for such purposes;
(2) To implement the purposes of this chapter first by
conference, conciliation and persuasion so that persons may
be guaranteed their civil rights and goodwill be fostered;
(3) To formulate policies to implement the purposes of
this chapter and to make recommendations to agencies and
officers of the state and political subdivisions in aid of
such policies and purposes;
(4) To appoint such employees as it may deem
necessary, fix their compensation within the appropriations
provided and in accordance with the wage structure
established for other state agencies, and prescribe their
duties;
(5) To obtain upon request and utilize the services of
all governmental departments and agencies to be paid from
appropriations to this commission;
(6) To adopt, promulgate, amend, and rescind suitable
rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this
chapter and the policies and practices of the commission in
connection therewith;
(7) To receive, investigate, initiate, and pass upon
complaints alleging discrimination in employment, housing or
in places of public accommodations because of race, color,

SB 1218 9
religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, age, as it relates to
employment, disability, veteran status, or familial status
as it relates to housing and to require the production for
examination of any books, papers, records, or other
materials relating to any matter under investigation;
(8) To hold hearings, subpoena witnesses, compel their
attendance, administer oaths, to take the testimony of any
person under oath, and, in connection therewith, to require
the production for examination of any books, papers or other
materials relating to any matter under investigation or in
question before the commission;
(9) To issue publications and the results of studies
and research which will tend to promote goodwill and
minimize or eliminate discrimination in housing, employment
or in places of public accommodation because of race, color,
religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, age, as it relates to
employment, disability, veteran status, or familial status
as it relates to housing;
(10) To provide each year to the governor and to the
general assembly a full written report of all its activities
and of its recommendations;
(11) To adopt an official seal;
(12) To cooperate, act jointly, enter into cooperative
or work-sharing agreements with the United States Equal
Employment Opportunity Commission, the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development, and other
federal agencies and local commissions or agencies to
achieve the purposes of this chapter;
(13) To accept grants, private gifts, bequests, and
establish funds to dispose of such moneys so long as the

SB 1218 10
conditions of the grant, gift, or bequest are not
inconsistent with the purposes of this chapter and are used
to achieve the purposes of this chapter;
(14) To establish a human rights fund as defined in
section 213.010, for the purposes of administering sections
213.040, 213.045, 213.050, 213.070, 213.075, and 213.076.
2. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated under the
authority of this chapter shall become effective unless it
has been promulgated pursuant to the provisions of [section
536.024] chapter 536.
213.040. 1. It shall be an unlawful housing practice:
(1) To refuse to sell or rent after the making of a
bona fide offer, to refuse to negotiate for the sale or
rental of, to deny or otherwise make unavailable, a dwelling
to any person because of race, color, religion, national
origin, ancestry, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,
disability, veteran status, or familial status;
(2) To discriminate against any person in the terms,
conditions, or privileges of sale or rental of a dwelling,
or in the provision of services or facilities in connection
therewith, because of race, color, religion, national
origin, ancestry, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,
disability, veteran status, or familial status;
(3) To make, print, or publish, or cause to be made,
printed, or published any notice, statement or
advertisement, with respect to the sale or rental of a
dwelling that indicates any preference, limitation, or
discrimination because of race, color, religion, national
origin, ancestry, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,
disability, veteran status, or familial status, or an
intention to make any such preference, limitation, or
discrimination;

SB 1218 11
(4) To represent to any person because of race, color,
religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, disability, veteran status, or
familial status that any dwelling is not available for
inspection, sale, or rental when such dwelling is in fact so
available;
(5) To induce or attempt to induce any person to sell
or rent any dwelling by representations regarding the entry
or prospective entry into the neighborhood of a person or
persons because of a particular race, color, religion,
national origin, ancestry, sex, sexual orientation, gender
identity, disability, veteran status, or familial status;
(6) To discriminate in the sale or rental of, or to
otherwise make unavailable or deny, a dwelling to any buyer
or renter because of a disability of:
(a) That buyer or renter;
(b) A person residing in or intending to reside in
that dwelling after it is so sold, rented, or made
available; or
(c) Any person associated with that buyer or renter;
(7) To discriminate against any person in the terms,
conditions, or privileges of sale or rental of a dwelling,
or in the provision of services or facilities in connection
with such dwelling, because of a disability of:
(a) That person;
(b) A person residing in or intending to reside in
that dwelling after it is so sold, rented, or made
available; or
(c) Any person associated with that person.
2. For purposes of this section and sections 213.045
and 213.050, discrimination includes:

SB 1218 12
(1) A refusal to permit, at the expense of the person
with the disability, reasonable modifications of existing
premises occupied or to be occupied by such person if such
modifications may be necessary to afford such person full
enjoyment of the premises, except that, in the case of a
rental, the landlord may, where it is reasonable to do so,
condition permission for a modification on the renter's
agreeing to restore the interior of the premises to the
condition that existed before the modification, reasonable
wear and tear excepted;
(2) A refusal to make reasonable accommodations in
rules, policies, practices, or services, when such
accommodations may be necessary to afford such person equal
opportunity to use and enjoy a dwelling; or
(3) In connection with the design and construction of
covered multifamily dwellings for first occupancy after
March 13, 1991, a failure to design and construct those
dwellings in such a manner that:
(a) The public use and common use portions of such
dwellings are readily accessible to and usable by persons
with a disability;
(b) All the doors designed to allow passage into and
within all premises within such dwellings are sufficiently
wide to allow passage by persons with a disability in
wheelchairs; and
(c) All premises within such dwellings contain the
following features of adaptive design:
a. An accessible route into and through the dwelling;
b. Light switches, electrical outlets, thermostats,
and other environmental controls in accessible locations;
c. Reinforcements in bathroom walls to allow later
installation of grab bars; and

SB 1218 13
d. Usable kitchens and bathrooms such that an
individual in a wheelchair can maneuver about the space.
3. As used in subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this
section, the term "covered multifamily dwelling" means:
(1) Buildings consisting of four or more units if such
buildings have one or more elevators; and
(2) Ground floor units in other buildings consisting
of four or more units.
4. Compliance with the appropriate requirements of the
American National Standard for Buildings and Facilities
providing accessibility and usability for people with
physical disabilities, commonly cited as "ANSI A117.1",
suffices to satisfy the requirements of paragraph (a) of
subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this section.
100 5. Where a unit of general local government has
101 incorporated into its laws the requirements set forth in
102 subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this section, compliance
103 with such laws shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements
104 of that subdivision. Such compliance shall be subject to
105 the following provisions:
106 (1) A unit of general local government may review and
107 approve newly constructed covered multifamily dwellings for
108 the purpose of making determinations as to whether the
109 design and construction requirements of subdivision (3) of
110 subsection 2 of this section are met;
111 (2) The commission shall encourage, but may not
112 require, the units of local government to include in their
113 existing procedures for the review and approval of newly
114 constructed covered multifamily dwellings, determinations as
115 to whether the design and construction of such dwellings are
116 consistent with subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this
117 section, and shall provide technical assistance to units of

SB 1218 14
118 local government and other persons to implement the
119 requirements of subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this
120 section;
121 (3) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to
122 require the commission to review or approve the plans,
123 designs or construction of all covered dwellings, to
124 determine whether the design and construction of such
125 dwellings are consistent with the requirements of
126 subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this section.
127 6. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to
128 invalidate or limit any law of the state or political
129 subdivision of the state, or other jurisdiction in which
130 this chapter shall be effective, that requires dwellings to
131 be designed and constructed in a manner that affords persons
132 with disabilities greater access than is required by this
133 chapter.
134 7. Nothing in this section and sections 213.045 and
135 213.050 requires that a dwelling be made available to an
136 individual whose tenancy would constitute a direct threat to
137 the health or safety of other individuals or whose tenancy
138 would result in substantial physical damage to the property
139 of others.
140 8. Nothing in this section and sections 213.045 and
141 213.050 limits the applicability of any reasonable local or
142 state restriction regarding the maximum number of occupants
143 permitted to occupy a dwelling, nor does any provision in
144 this section and sections 213.045 and 213.050 regarding
145 familial status apply with respect to housing for older
146 persons.
147 9. As used in this section and sections 213.045 and
148 213.050, "housing for older persons" means housing:

SB 1218 15
149 (1) Provided under any state or federal program that
150 the commission determines is specifically designed and
151 operated to assist elderly persons, as defined in the state
152 or federal program;
153 (2) Intended for, and solely occupied by, persons
154 sixty-two years of age or older; or
155 (3) Intended and operated for occupancy by at least
156 one person fifty-five years of age or older per unit. In
157 determining whether housing qualifies as housing for older
158 persons under this subsection, the commission shall develop
159 regulations which require at least the following factors:
160 (a) The existence of significant facilities and
161 services specifically designed to meet the physical or
162 social needs of older persons, or if the provision of such
163 facilities and services is not practicable, that such
164 housing is necessary to provide important housing
165 opportunities for older persons; and
166 (b) That at least eighty percent of the units are
167 occupied by at least one person fifty-five years of age or
168 older per unit; and
169 (c) The publication of, and adherence to, policies and
170 procedures which demonstrate an intent by the owner or
171 manager to provide housing for persons fifty-five years of
172 age or older.
173 10. Housing shall not fail to meet the requirements
174 for housing for older persons by reason of:
175 (1) Persons residing in such housing as of August 28,
176 1992, who do not meet the age requirements of subdivision
177 (2) or (3) of subsection 9 of this section, provided that
178 new occupants of such housing meet the age requirements of
179 subdivision (2) or (3) of subsection 9 of this section; or

SB 1218 16
180 (2) Unoccupied units, provided that such units are
181 reserved for occupancy by persons who meet the age
182 requirements of subdivision (2) or (3) of subsection 9 of
183 this section.
184 11. Nothing in this section or section 213.045 or
185 213.050 shall prohibit conduct against a person because such
186 person has been convicted by any court of competent
187 jurisdiction of the illegal manufacture or distribution of a
188 controlled substance, as defined by section 195.010.
189 12. Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a religious
190 organization, association, or society, or any nonprofit
191 institution or organization operated, supervised or
192 controlled by or in conjunction with a religious
193 organization, association, or society, from limiting the
194 sale, rental or occupancy of dwellings which it owns or
195 operates for other than a commercial purpose to persons of
196 the same religion, or from giving preference to such
197 persons, unless membership in such religion is restricted on
198 account of race, color, or national origin. Nor shall
199 anything in this chapter prohibit a private club not in fact
200 open to the public, which as an incident to its primary
201 purpose or purposes provides lodging which it owns or
202 operates for other than a commercial purpose, from limiting
203 the rental or occupancy of such lodging to its members or
204 from giving preference to its members.
205 13. Nothing in this chapter, other than the
206 prohibitions against discriminatory advertising in
207 subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of this section, shall apply
208 to:
209 (1) The sale or rental of any single family house by a
210 private individual owner, provided the following conditions
211 are met:

SB 1218 17
212 (a) The private individual owner does not own or have
213 any interest in more than three single family houses at any
214 one time; and
215 (b) The house is sold or rented without the use of a
216 real estate broker, agent or salesperson or the facilities
217 of any person in the business of selling or renting
218 dwellings and without publication, posting or mailing of any
219 advertisement. If the owner selling the house does not
220 reside in it at the time of the sale or was not the most
221 recent resident of the house prior to such sale, the
222 exemption in this section applies to only one such sale in
223 any twenty-four-month period; or
224 (2) Rooms or units in dwellings containing living
225 quarters occupied or intended to be occupied by no more than
226 four families living independently of each other, if the
227 owner actually maintains and occupies one of such living
228 quarters as his or her residence.
213.045. It shall be unlawful for any bank, building
and loan association, insurance company or other
corporation, association, firm or enterprise whose business
consists in whole or in part in the making of commercial
real estate loans, to deny a loan or other financial
assistance because of race, color, religion, national
origin, ancestry, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,
disability, veteran status, or familial status to a person
applying therefor for the purpose of purchasing,
construction, improving, repairing, or maintaining a
dwelling, or to discriminate against [him] such person in
fixing of the amount, interest rate, duration or other terms
or conditions of such loan or other financial assistance,
because of the race, color, religion, national origin,
ancestry, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,

SB 1218 18
disability, veteran status, or familial status of such
person or of any person associated with [him] such person in
connection with such loan or other financial assistance, or
of the present or prospective owners, lessees, tenants, or
occupants, of the dwellings in relation to which such loan
or other financial assistance is to be made or given.
213.050. It shall be unlawful to deny any person
access to or membership or participation in any multiple
listing service, real estate brokers' organization or other
service organization, or facility relating to the business
of selling or renting dwellings, because of race, color,
religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, disability, veteran status, or
familial status.
213.055. 1. It shall be an unlawful employment
practice:
(1) For an employer, because of the race, color,
religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender
identity, ancestry, age [or], disability, or veteran status
of any individual:
(a) To fail or refuse to hire or to discharge any
individual, or otherwise to discriminate against any
individual with respect to [his] such individual's
compensation, terms, conditions, or privileges of
employment, because of such individual's race, color,
religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender
identity, ancestry, age [or], disability, or veteran status;
(b) To limit, segregate, or classify [his] employees
or [his] employment applicants in any way which would
deprive or tend to deprive any individual of employment
opportunities or otherwise adversely affect [his] such
individual's status as an employee, because of such

SB 1218 19
individual's race, color, religion, national origin, sex,
sexual orientation, gender identity, ancestry, age [or],
disability, or veteran status;
(2) For a labor organization to exclude or to expel
from its membership any individual or to discriminate in any
way against any of its members or against any employer or
any individual employed by an employer because of race,
color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation,
gender identity, ancestry, age [or], disability, or veteran
status of any individual; or to limit, segregate, or
classify its membership, or to classify or fail or refuse to
refer for employment any individual, in any way which would
deprive or tend to deprive any individual of employment
opportunities, or would limit such employment opportunities
or otherwise adversely affect [his] such individual's status
as an employee or as an applicant for employment, because of
such individual's race, color, religion, national origin,
sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, ancestry, age
[or], disability, or veteran status; or for any employer,
labor organization, or joint labor-management committee
controlling apprenticeship or other training or retraining,
including on-the-job training programs to discriminate
against any individual because of [his] such individual's
race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, ancestry, age [or],
disability, or veteran status in admission to, or employment
in, any program established to provide apprenticeship or
other training;
(3) For any employer or employment agency to print or
circulate or cause to be printed or circulated any
statement, advertisement or publication, or to use any form
of application for employment or to make any inquiry in

SB 1218 20
connection with prospective employment, which expresses,
directly or indirectly, any limitation, specification, or
discrimination, because of race, color, religion, national
origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, ancestry,
age [or], disability, or veteran status unless based upon a
bona fide occupational qualification or for an employment
agency to fail or refuse to refer for employment, or
otherwise to discriminate against, any individual because of
his or her race, color, religion, national origin, sex,
sexual orientation, gender identity, ancestry, age, as it
relates to employment, [or] disability, or veteran status,
or to classify or refer for employment any individual
because of [his or her] such individual's race, color,
religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender
identity, ancestry, age [or], disability, or veteran status.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of this
chapter, it shall not be an unlawful employment practice for
an employer to apply different standards of compensation, or
different terms, conditions or privileges of employment
pursuant to a bona fide seniority or merit system, or a
system which measures earnings by quantity or quality of
production or to employees who work in different locations,
provided that such differences or such systems are not the
result of an intention or a design to discriminate, and are
not used to discriminate, because of race, color, religion,
sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin,
ancestry, age [or], disability, or veteran status, nor shall
it be an unlawful employment practice for an employer to
give and to act upon the results of any professionally
developed ability test, provided that such test, its
administration, or action upon the results thereof, is not
designed, intended or used to discriminate because of race,

SB 1218 21
color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation,
gender identity, ancestry, age [or], disability, or veteran
status.
3. Nothing contained in this chapter shall be
interpreted to require any employer, employment agency,
labor organization, or joint labor-management committee
subject to this chapter to grant preferential treatment to
any individual or to any group because of the race, color,
religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender
identity, ancestry, age [or], disability, or veteran status
of such individual or group on account of an imbalance which
may exist with respect to the total number or percentage of
persons of any race, color, religion, national origin, sex,
sexual orientation, gender identity, ancestry, age [or],
disability, or veteran status employed by any employer,
referred or classified for employment by any employment
agency or labor organization, admitted to membership or
100 classified by any labor organization, or admitted to or
101 employed in any apprenticeship or other training program, in
102 comparison with the total number or percentage of persons of
103 such race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual
104 orientation, gender identity, ancestry, age [or],
105 disability, or veteran status in any community, state,
106 section, or other area, or in the available workforce in any
107 community, state, section, or other area.
108 4. Notwithstanding any other provision of this
109 chapter, it shall not be an unlawful employment practice for
110 the state or any political subdivision of the state to
111 comply with the provisions of 29 U.S.C. Section 623 relating
112 to employment as firefighters or law enforcement officers.
213.065. 1. All persons within the jurisdiction of
the state of Missouri are free and equal and shall be

SB 1218 22
entitled to the full and equal use and enjoyment within this
state of any place of public accommodation, as hereinafter
defined, without discrimination or segregation because of
race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, ancestry, [or] disability, or
veteran status.
2. It is an unlawful discriminatory practice for any
person, directly or indirectly, to refuse, withhold from or
deny any other person, or to attempt to refuse, withhold
from or deny any other person, any of the accommodations,
advantages, facilities, services, or privileges made
available in any place of public accommodation, as defined
in section 213.010 and this section, or to segregate or
discriminate against any such person in the use thereof
because of race, color, religion, national origin, sex,
sexual orientation, gender identity, ancestry, [or]
disability, or veteran status.
3. The provisions of this section shall not apply to a
private club, a place of accommodation owned by or operated
on behalf of a religious corporation, association or
society, or other establishment which is not in fact open to
the public, unless the facilities of such establishments are
made available to the customers or patrons of a place of
public accommodation as defined in section 213.010 and this
section.
213.070. 1. It shall be an unlawful discriminatory
practice for an employer, employment agency, labor
organization, or place of public accommodation:
(1) To aid, abet, incite, compel, or coerce the
commission of acts prohibited under this chapter or to
attempt to do so;

SB 1218 23
(2) To retaliate or discriminate in any manner against
any other person because such person has opposed any
practice prohibited by this chapter or because such person
has filed a complaint, testified, assisted, or participated
in any manner in any investigation, proceeding or hearing
conducted pursuant to this chapter;
(3) For the state or any political subdivision of this
state to discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion,
national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,
ancestry, age, as it relates to employment, disability,
veteran status, or familial status as it relates to housing;
or
(4) To discriminate in any manner against any other
person because of such person's association with any person
protected by this chapter.
2. This chapter, in addition to chapter 285 and
chapter 287, shall provide the exclusive remedy for any and
all claims for injury or damages arising out of an
employment relationship.
213.101. 1. The provisions of this chapter shall be
construed to accomplish the purposes thereof and any law
inconsistent with any provision of this chapter shall not
apply. Nothing contained in this chapter shall be deemed to
repeal any of the provisions of any law of this state
relating to discrimination because of race, color, religion,
national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,
ancestry, age, disability, veteran status, or familial
status.
2. The general assembly hereby expressly abrogates the
case of McBryde v. Ritenour School District, 207 S.W.3d 162
(Mo.App. E.D. 2006), and its progeny as it relates to the
necessity and appropriateness of the issuance of a business

SB 1218 24
judgment instruction. In all civil actions brought under
this chapter, a jury shall be given an instruction
expressing the business judgment rule.
3. If an employer in a case brought under this chapter
files a motion pursuant to rule 74.04 of the Missouri rules
of civil procedure, the court shall consider the burden-
shifting analysis of McDonnell Douglas Corp. v. Green, 411
U.S. 792 (1973), and its progeny to be highly persuasive for
analysis in cases not involving direct evidence of
discrimination.
4. The general assembly hereby expressly abrogates by
this statute the cases of Daugherty v. City of Maryland
Heights, 231 S.W.3d 814 (Mo. 2007) and its progeny as they
relate to the contributing factor standard and abandonment
of the burden-shifting framework established in McDonnell
Douglas Corp. v. Green, 411 U.S. 792 (1973).
5. The general assembly hereby expressly abrogates by
this statute the holding in Hurst v. Kansas City Mo. School
District, 437 S.W.3d 327 (Mo.App. W.D. 2014), that Missouri
Approved Instruction 19.01 may be applied to actions brought
pursuant to this chapter, and the holding in Thomas v.
McKeever's Enterprises, Inc., 388 S.W.3d 206 (Mo.App. W.D.
2012), that juries shall not be instructed that plaintiffs
bear the burden of establishing "but for" causation in
actions brought pursuant to this chapter.
6. The general assembly hereby abrogates all Missouri-
approved jury instructions specifically addressing civil
actions brought under this chapter which were in effect
prior to August 28, 2017.
✓